src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_KǬŅIM-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 155
     NMN_KǬŅIM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĒTAM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 156
	N_ĒTAM-SG	;
	N_ĒTAM-PL	;
LEXICON N_ĒTAM-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 156
 NMN_ĒTAM-SG   ;
LEXICON N_ĒTAM-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 156
     NMN_ĒTAM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SIDĀM !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 157
 NMN_SIDĀM	;
LEXICON N_SIDĀM-PL	!!≈ * **@CODE@** : 157
     NMN_SIDĀM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TŪOITÕG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 158
 NMN_TŪOITÕG	;

LEXICON N_KǬRAND !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 159
!! * Yaml: **armtõb**
	N_KǬRAND-SG	;
	N_KǬRAND-PL	;
LEXICON N_KǬRAND-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 159
 NMN_KǬRAND-SG	;
LEXICON N_KǬRAND-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 159
     NMN_KǬRAND-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ȬʼDÕG !!≈ * **@CODE@** ȭʼdõg:ȭdõg 160
 NMN_ȬʼDÕG	;

LEXICON N_TAPTÕD !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 161
 NMN_TAPTÕD	;

!LEXICON N_TĪʼEDÕD !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
! NMN_TĪʼEDÕD	;

!LEXICON N-VĪDÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 163
! NMN_VĪDÕZ	;

LEXICON N_TUOISTÕNZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 164
 NMN_TUOISTÕNZ	;

!LEXICON N_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
! NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ	;

LEXICON N_MĪEZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** mīez:m 166
 NMN_MĪEZ	;

LEXICON N_ROʼVZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
 N_ROʼVZ-SG ;
 N_ROʼVZ-PL ;
LEXICON N_ROʼVZ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
 NMN_ROʼVZ-SG	;
LEXICON N_ROʼVZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
 NMN_ROʼVZ-PL	;

!LEXICON N_KÄBRĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 168
!!≈ * Yaml: **A-kaebraaz**
! NMN_KÄBRĀZ	;

!LEXICON N_MAIGĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 169
! N_MAIGĀZ-SG ;
! N_MAIGĀZ-PL ;

!LEXICON N_MAIGĀZ-SG
! NMN_MAIGĀZ-SG	;
!LEXICON N_MAIGĀZ-PL
! NMN_MAIGĀZ-PL	;

LEXICON N_NÕTKĀZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 170
 NMN_NÕTKĀZ	;

!LEXICON N_RIKĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rikāz: 171
! NMN_RIKĀZ	;
LEXICON N_RIKĀZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** rikāz: 171
     NMN_RIKĀZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 172
 N_BIKŠĀZ-SG	;
 N_BIKŠĀZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 172
 NMN_BIKŠĀZ-SG	;
LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 172
     NMN_BIKŠĀZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 173
 NMN_ĀMBAZ	;
LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 173
     NMN_ĀMBAZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PŪŖAZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 174
 NMN_PŪŖAZ	;

!LEXICON N_PǬĻAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 175
! NMN_PǬĻAZ	;

LEXICON N_RĒNAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 176
 NMN_RĒNAZ	;
LEXICON N_RĒNAZ-PL	!!≈ * **@CODE@** : 176
     NMN_RĒNAZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TŌVAZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 177
 NMN_TŌVAZ	;

LEXICON N_PŪORAZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pūoraz: 178
 NMN_PŪORAZ	;

LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** mõtkõz: 179
 NMN_MÕTKÕZ	;
LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** mõtkõz: 179
     NMN_MÕTKÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
	N_VȬRÕZ-SG	;
	N_VȬRÕZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
     NMN_VȬRÕZ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
     NMN_VȬRÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 181 arāgõz:arāgõ
	N_ARĀGÕZ-SG	;
	N_ARĀGÕZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 181
     NMN_ARĀGÕZ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 181
     NMN_ARĀGÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** äʼggõz:äggõz 182
 NMN_ÄʼGGÕZ	;
LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** äʼggõz:äggõz 182
     NMN_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
 NMN_PŪʼDÕZ	;

LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
     NMN_PŪʼDÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 184
 NMN_VĪETŠÕZ	;
LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 184
     NMN_VĪETŠÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LǬʼTŠÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185
 NMN_LǬʼTŠÕZ	;

LEXICON N_SĒJI !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 186
 NMN_SĒJI	;

LEXICON N_AKKIJI !!≈ * **@CODE@** akkiji:akkiji 187
	N_AKKIJI-SG  ;
	N_AKKIJI-PL  ;
LEXICON N_AKKIJI-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 187
     NMN_AKKIJI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_AKKIJI-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 187
     NMN_AKKIJI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LĒʼJI !!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼji:lēji 188
	N_LĒʼJI-SG	;
	N_LĒʼJI-PL	;
LEXICON	N_LĒʼJI-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼji:lēji 188
 NMN_LĒʼJI-SG   ;
LEXICON	N_LĒʼJI-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼji:lēji 188
 NMN_LĒʼJI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TUĻĻI !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 189
 NMN_TUĻĻI	;

LEXICON N_LÄʼBḐI !!≈ * **@CODE@** läʼbḑi:läbḑi 190
 NMN_LÄʼBḐI	;

LEXICON N_NAI !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 191
 NMN_NAI	;

LEXICON N_AʼIGI !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼigi:aigi 192
 NMN_AʼIGI	;
LEXICON N_AʼIGI-PL	!!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼigi:aigi 192
     NMN_AʼIGI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PUʼNNI !!≈ * **@CODE@** puʼnni:punni 193
 NMN_PUʼNNI	;
LEXICON N_PUʼNNI-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** puʼnni:punni 193
     NMN_PUʼNNI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KAȚKI !!≈ * **@CODE@** kațki: 194
 NMN_KAȚKI	;

LEXICON N_KUKKI !!≈ * **@CODE@** kukki: 195
 NMN_KUKKI	;

!LEXICON N_AIGI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aigi:aigi 196
! NMN_AIGI	;

!LEXICON N_OUKI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 197
! NMN_OUKI	;

!LEXICON N_PAŖĪ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 198
! NMN_PAŖĪ	;

LEXICON N_TŪĻI !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 199
!! ~422
 NMN_TŪĻI	;
LEXICON N_TŪĻI-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 199
 NMN_TŪĻI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AʼBLI !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼbli:aʼbli 200
!! ~567
 N_AʼBLI-SG ;
 N_AʼBLI-PL ;

LEXICON N_AʼBLI-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼbli:aʼbli 200
 NMN_AʼBLI-SG ;
LEXICON N_AʼBLI-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** aʼbli:aʼbli 200
 NMN_AʼBLI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SĒMI !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 201
	N_SĒMI-SG	;
	N_SĒMI-PL	;

LEXICON N_SĒMI-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 201
     NMN_SĒMI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_SĒMI-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 201
     NMN_SĒMI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LĒʼMI !!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
!!= Yaml: **A-aqrlimi**
	N_LĒʼMI-SG	;
	N_LĒʼMI-PL	;

LEXICON N_LĒʼMI-SG	!!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
     NMN_LĒʼMI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_LĒʼMI-PL	!!≈ * **@CODE@** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
     NMN_LĒʼMI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ALĪZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 203
	N_ALĪZ-SG	;
	N_ALĪZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_ALĪZ-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 203
     NMN_ALĪZ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_ALĪZ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 203
     NMN_ALĪZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_NȬŖKÕZ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 204
 NMN_NȬŖKÕZ	;

LEXICON N_KATŪKS !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 205
 NMN_KATŪKS	;

LEXICON N_KATŪKS-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 205
     NMN_KATŪKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĀNDÕKS !!≈ * **@CODE@** āndõks: 206
 NMN_ĀNDÕKS	;
LEXICON N_ĀNDÕKS-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** āndõks: 206
     NMN_ĀNDÕKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KĒRATÕKS !!≈ * **@CODE@** kēratõks:kēratõks 207
 NMN_KĒRATÕKS	;

LEXICON N_ÄʼBȚÕKS !!≈ * **@CODE@** äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
 NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS	;
LEXICON N_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
     NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VARĪKŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 209
 N_VARĪKŠ-SG ;
 N_VARĪKŠ-PL ;

LEXICON N_VARĪKŠ-SG
 NMN_VARĪKŠ-SG	;
LEXICON N_VARĪKŠ-PL
 NMN_VARĪKŠ-PL	;

LEXICON N_UKŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 210
 NMN_UKŠ	;

LEXICON N_LÄPŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** läpš:laps 211
    NMN_LÄPŠ ;
LEXICON N_LÄPŠ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** läpš:laps 211
    NMN_LÄPŠ-PL ;

!LEXICON N_RIŠTĪNG-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 212
! NMN_RIŠTĪNG-SG	;

LEXICON N_ROʼVZT-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** roʼvzt:roʼvz 212
 NMN_ROʼVZT-PL	;

LEXICON N_TUʼĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 213
 NMN_TUʼĻ	;

LEXICON N_TŪĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 214
 NMN_TŪĻ	;

LEXICON N_KĒĻ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kēļ:kēl 215
 NMN_KĒĻ	;

LEXICON N_PŪOL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 216 pūol:pūol
 NMN_PŪOL	;

LEXICON N_PŪOL-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 216
     NMN_PŪOL-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĪKŠ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 217
 NMN_ĪKŠ	;

!LEXICON N_KAKŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 218
! NMN_KAKŠ	;

!LEXICON N_ŪŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 219
! NMN_ŪŽ	;

LEXICON N_SĒŅ !!≈ * **@CODE@** sēņ:sēn 220
 NMN_SĒŅ	;

LEXICON N_JŪŖ !!≈ * **@CODE@** jūŗ:jūr 221
 NMN_JŪŖ	;
LEXICON N_JŪŖ-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 221
     NMN_JŪŖ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SŪR !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 222
 NMN_SŪR	;

LEXICON N_SĒR !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 223
 NMN_SĒR	;

LEXICON N_BIRKOV !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 224 birkov:birkov
 N_BIRKOV-SG	 ;
 N_BIRKOV-PL	 ;
LEXICON N_BIRKOV-SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 224	birkov:birkov
 NMN_BIRKOV-SG	;
LEXICON N_BIRKOV-PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 224	birkov:birkov
 NMN_BIRKOV-PL	;

LEXICON N_SALĀJ !!≈ * **@CODE@** : 225
 NMN_SALĀJ	;
!LEXICON N_SALĀJ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 225
! NMN_SALĀJ-SG	;
