src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
aigi+N:aʼigi N_AʼIGI  "seinän, aidan reuna, vieri" ;
aigizt+N:aʼigi N_AʼIGI-PL  "irtaimisto" ;
bikšāz+N:bikšāz N_BIKŠĀZ  "housut" ;
biltbikšõd+N:bilt#bikšāz N_BIKŠĀZ-PL  "" ;
ikškõrdikš+N:ikš#kõrd#ikš N_ĪKŠ  "kertotaulu" ;
jarāndõmõd+N:jarāndõm N_KǬRAND-PL  "eritteet" ;
kaibdõd+N:kaibdõd N_TAPTÕD  "syytetty" ;
kartōn+N:kartōn N_SIDĀM  "kartonki" ;
kikbikšõd+N:kik#bikšāz N_BIKŠĀZ-PL  "kevätesikko" ;
kirsūord+N:kiʼr#sūor N_JŪŖ-PL  "niskasuonet" ;
kätsāz+N:kätsā N_NÕTKĀZ  "kalvosin" ;
kūorapalātõm+N:kūora#palātõm N_KǬRAND  "korvatulehdus" ;
kūzȭdõg+N:kūz#ȭʼdõg N_ȬʼDÕG  "jouluilta" ;
kōtšõd+N:kǭtšõ N_VĪETŠÕZ-PL  "housut" ;
lejavõtāmõd+N:leja#võtām N_SIDĀM-PL  "pääsiäinen" ;
lipskõz+N:lipskõ N_MÕTKÕZ  "tukku" ;
läpš+N:laps N_LÄPŠ  "lapsi" ;
lōtšõz+N:lǭʼtšõz N_LǬʼTŠÕZ  "ruiskattara" ;
marspūŗaz+N:mars#pūŗŗaz N_PŪŖAZ  "märssypurje" ;
matūkst+N:matūks N_KATŪKS-PL  "hautajaiset" ;
mōrovz+N:mǭ#roʼv N_ROʼVZ  "maalaisväestö" ;
naioppiji+N:nai#oppiji N_AKKIJI  "oppityttö" ;
naizmīez+N:naiz#mīʼez N_MĪEZ  "aviomies" ;
nūojõm+N:nūojõm N_TŪOITÕG  "katos" ;
papārd+N:papār N_SIDĀM-PL  "sananjalka" ;
paļgõd+N:pāļgaz N_ĀMBAZ-PL  "länget" ;
pițki+N:pițki N_KAȚKI  "ukkonen" ;
piļgõm+N:piʼļgõm N_ȬʼDÕG  "maili" ;
piņripskõz+N:piʼņ#ripskõ N_MÕTKÕZ  "hukanputki" ;
prorektōr+N:prorektōr N_SIDĀM  "vararehtori" ;
purōv+N:purōv N_BIRKOV  "purjo" ;
puțkõjērnaz+N:puțkõ#jērnaz N_ĀMBAZ  "hajuherne" ;
põzāgõd+N:põzāgõ N_ARĀGÕZ-PL  "roskat" ;
pālkanai+N:pālka#nai N_NAI  "palvelijatar" ;
pālkatīeli+N:pālka#tīeli N_TŪĻI  "palkkatyöläinen" ;
pūašrattõd+N:pū#aš#ratā N_RIKĀZ-PL  "" ;
pūoraz+N:pūoraz N_PŪORAZ  "porsas" ;
pǟvapimdõks+N:pǟva#piʼmdõks N_ÄʼBȚÕKS  "auringonpimennys" ;
rapšõz+N:rapšõ N_VĪETŠÕZ  "rapsi" ;
rattõdtēji+N:rattõd#tēji N_SĒJI  "vaunuseppä" ;
reinõd+N:rēinaz N_RĒNAZ  "" ;
reḑḑõlambõd+N:reḑḑõl#āmbaz N_ĀMBAZ-PL  "harvat hampaat" ;
riekkēji+N:riek#kēʼji N_LĒʼJI  "tien kulkija" ;
riškizt+N:riški N_TŪĻI-PL  "ristiäiset" ;
rougõz+N:roʼugõ N_ÄʼGGÕZ  "rauhanen" ;
rāndakēļ+N:rānda#kīel N_KĒĻ  "liivin kieli" ;
rēkõm+N:rēkõm N_KǬRAND  "laskelma" ;
rēviļtimi+N:rēviļtimi N_AʼBLI  "ryöstö" ;
sabriki+N:saʼbriki N_LĒʼMI  "saukko" ;
sigādõz+N:sigādõz N_NȬŖKÕZ  "sikamaisuus" ;
sižālikki+N:sižālikki N_KUKKI  "sisilisko" ;
strōiptõd+N:strǭiptõd N_TAPTÕD  "tuomittu" ;
suodārattõd+N:suodā#ratā N_RIKĀZ-PL  "sotavaunut" ;
sulli+N:suʼl N_PUʼNNI  "renki" ;
sēr+N:sǟr N_SĒR  "sääri" ;
sūdlõks+N:sūdlõks N_ĀNDÕKS  "suudelma" ;
sūlaggõd+N:sū#laʼggõ N_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL  "suulaki" ;
sūoļ+N:sūol N_TŪĻ  "suoli" ;
sūrpūŗaz+N:sūr#pūŗŗaz N_PŪŖAZ  "isopurje" ;
sǟr+N:sǟr N_SŪR  "sadepilvi" ;
sǟrmõz+N:sǟʼrmõ N_PŪʼDÕZ  "kärppä" ;
tallizt+N:taʼlli N_PUʼNNI-PL  "telineet" ;
tieudmīez+N:tieud#mīʼez N_MĪEZ  "tutkija" ;
tortläbḑi+N:tort#läʼbḑi N_LÄʼBḐI  "kakkulapio" ;
tsitronkūoŗ+N:tsitron#kūor N_JŪŖ  "sitruunankuori" ;
tuoistõnd+N:tuoistõnd N_TUOISTÕNZ  "" ;
tuoiztpūold+N:tuoizt#pūol N_PŪOL-PL  "jälkeiset" ;
tuļļi+N:tuʼļļi N_TUĻĻI  "kuumuus" ;
tīerovz+N:tīe#roʼv N_ROʼVZ  "työväestö" ;
tīlkaz+N:tīlkaz N_ĀMBAZ  "jääpuikko" ;
tōvaz+N:tōuvaz N_TŌVAZ  "myrsky" ;
tōlauņ+N:tǭla#ūʼn N_TUʼĻ  "talviuni" ;
ukš+N:uks N_UKŠ  "ovi" ;
ulzeitmõd+N:ulz#ētam N_ĒTAM-PL  "uloste" ;
vaimandõkst+N:vaim#andõks N_ĀNDÕKS-PL  "hengenlahjat" ;
vajāgõz+N:vajāgõ N_ARĀGÕZ  "tarve" ;
vanbizt+N:vaʼnbi N_SĒMI-PL  "vanhemmat" ;
veļīlapst+N:veļī#laps N_LÄPŠ-PL  "veljen lapset" ;
veļki+N:veʼļki N_SĒMI  "pikkuveli" ;
viedtõkst+N:vieʼdtõks N_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL  "tiskivesi" ;
vierkazāj+N:vieʼr#kazāj N_SALĀJ  "verisyöpä" ;
viltsīņtõbtupūks+N:viltsīņtõb#tupūks N_KATŪKS  "ruko" ;
vǟrõd+N:vǟʼrõ N_PŪʼDÕZ-PL  "portti" ;
vȯstājizt+N:vȯstāji N_AKKIJI-PL  "ostajakunta" ;
vȯstātõks+N:vȯstātõks N_KĒRATÕKS  "ostettavuus" ;
vȯddõrsūrmõd+N:vȯʼddõr#sūrmõ N_VȬRÕZ-PL  "ohraryynit" ;
õpkāz+N:õpkā N_NÕTKĀZ  "karju" ;
āinarovzt+N:āina#roʼvz N_ROʼVZT-PL  "heinäväki" ;
ēdrõmõd+N:ēdrõm N_KǬRAND-PL  "kuukautiset" ;
ētam+N:ēitam N_ĒTAM  "heitto" ;
īelõigiz+N:īel#õigiz N_ALĪZ  "äänestysoikeus" ;
īdkäbālizt+N:īʼd#käbāli N_AʼBLI-PL  "kavioeläin" ;
štokīzõr+N:štokīzõr N_TŪOITÕG  "harkkorauta" ;
ūoļikš+N:ūoļikš N_VARĪKŠ  "huolto" ;
žnougõd+N:žnougõ N_MÕTKÕZ-PL  "kidukset" ;
ōgisigāsēņ+N:ǭʼgi#sigā#sīen N_SĒŅ  "mustarousku" ;
ȭdõgizt+N:ȭʼdõgi N_LĒʼMI-PL  "illallinen" ;
ȭdõgpūol+N:ȭʼdõg#pūol N_PŪOL  "iltapäivä" ;
sāinakōrtõz+N:sāina#kǭrtõ N_VȬRÕZ  "seinäkartta" ;
valdõigizt+N:vald#õigiz N_ALĪZ-PL  "valtio-oikeus" ;
